Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 1.1. Virginia Minimum Wage Act.

§ 40.1-28.8.
Short title.

This article shall be known as the Virginia Minimum Wage Act.

History.

1975, c. 530.

The numbers of §§

40.1-28.8

through

40.1-28.12

were designated by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1975 act having been

40.1-28.7

through

40.1-28.11

.

Cross references.

As to employment discrimination against otherwise qualified persons with disabilities, see §

51.5-41

.

As to definition of “new job,” see §

58.1-405.1

.

Law Review.

For a note, “Are You Breaking Some Sort of Law?:
Protecting an Employee’s Informal Complaints Under the Fair Labor Standards Act’s Anti-Retaliation Provision,” see 42 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 319 (2000).

§ 40.1-28.9.
Definitions; determining wage of tipped employee.

As used in this article:“Adjusted state hourly minimum wage” means the amount established by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection H of §

40.1-28.10

.“Domestic service” means services related to the care of an individual in a private home or the maintenance of a private home or its premises, on a permanent or temporary basis, including services performed by individuals such as companions, cooks, waiters, butlers, maids, valets, and chauffeurs.“Employee” includes any individual employed by an employer. “Employee” includes a home care provider. “Employee” does not include the following:

Any person employed as a farm laborer or farm employee;

Any person engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization where the relationship of employer-employee does not, in fact, exist or where the services rendered to such organization are on a voluntary basis;

Caddies on golf courses;

Traveling salesmen or outside salesmen working on a commission basis; taxicab drivers and operators;

Any person under the age of 18 in the employ of his parent or legal guardian;

Any person confined in any penal or corrective institution of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions or admitted to a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services;

Any person employed by a summer camp for boys, girls, or both boys and girls;

Any person under the age of 16, regardless of by whom employed;

Any person who is paid pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 214(c) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended;

Students participating in a bona fide educational program;

Any person who is less than 18 years of age and who is currently enrolled on a full-time basis in any secondary school, institution of higher education, or trade school, provided that the person is not employed more than 20 hours per week;

Any person of any age who is currently enrolled on a full-time basis in any secondary school, institution of higher education, or trade school and is in a work-study program or its equivalent at the institution at which he is enrolled as a student;

Any person who works as a babysitter for fewer than 10 hours per week;

Any person participating as an au pair in the U.S. Department of State’s Exchange Visitor Program governed by 22 C.F.R. § 62.31;

Any individual employed as a temporary foreign worker as governed by 20 C.F.R. Part 655; and

Any person who is exempt from the federal minimum wage pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 213(a)(3).“Employer” includes any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or business trust or any person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee. “Employer” includes the Commonwealth, any of its agencies, institutions, or political subdivisions, and any public body.“Federal minimum wage” means the minimum wage or, if applicable, the federal training wage prescribed by the U.S. Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.“Home care provider” means an individual who provides (i) home health services, including services provided by or under the direct supervision of any health care professional under a medical plan of care in a patient’s residence on a visit or hourly basis to patients who have or are at risk of injury, illness, or a disabling condition and require short-term or long-term interventions, or (ii) personal care services, including assistance in personal care to include activities of a daily living provided in an individual’s residence on a visit or hourly basis to individuals who have or are at risk of an illness, injury, or disabling condition.“Tipped employee” means an employee who in the course of employment customarily and regularly receives tips totaling more than $30 each month from persons other than the employee’s employer.“Wages” means legal tender of the United States or checks or drafts on banks negotiable into cash on demand or upon acceptance at full value. “Wages” includes the reasonable cost to the employer of furnishing meals and lodging to an employee if such board or lodging is customarily furnished by the employer and used by the employee.

In determining the wage of a tipped employee, the amount paid such employee by his employer shall be deemed to be increased on account of tips by an amount determined by the employer, except in the case of an employee who establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the actual amount of tips received by him was less than the amount determined by the employer. In such case, the amount paid such employee by his employer shall be deemed to have been increased by such lesser amount. An employer shall not classify an individual as a tipped employee if the individual is prohibited by applicable federal or state law or regulation from soliciting tips.

History.

1975, c. 530; 1976, c. 442; 1977, c. 432; 2007, cc. 816, 832; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, c. 734; 2019, cc. 330, 331; 2020, cc. 1145, 1146, 1147, 1204, 1242.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts
2020, c. 1147, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Commerce and Trade shall convene a work group consisting of representatives from the Department of Labor and Industry, the Virginia Employment Commission, the Workers’ Compensation Commission, organizations representing domestic workers, and such other stakeholders as the Secretary of Commerce and Trade shall deem appropriate to make recommendations, including any necessary statutory and regulatory changes, with regard to protecting domestic service employees from workplace harassment and discrimination, providing remedies for such employees for the nonpayment of wages, ensuring the safety and health of such employees in the workplace, and protecting such employees from loss of income as a result of unemployment or employment-related injury by including coverage of such employees in the Virginia Unemployment Compensation Act and the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor and the House Committee on Labor and Commerce by November 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1204 and
1242, cl. 2 provides: “Beginning January 1, 2022, the Virginia Department of Housing and Community Development, the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority, and the Virginia Employment Commission (the agencies) shall conduct a joint review of the feasibility and potential impact of instituting a regional minimum wage in the Commonwealth. In evaluating a regional minimum wage, the agencies shall form a work group to assess various factors, including, but not limited to, the cost of living in the Commonwealth; the potential impact on employers and any fringe benefits offered to employees such as employer-sponsored health insurance; the potential impact on workers, with a focus on income inequality; the potential impact on agricultural workers; the experience of other states with a regional wage; and the equity and fairness of the exemption from the minimum wage for any person employed as a farm laborer or farm employee provided by
§

40.1-28.10

of the Code of Virginia. The agencies also shall provide an assessment of options for utilizing a minimum wage in the Commonwealth, the feasibility of a regional minimum wage, and the economic benefits or impacts of utilizing a minimum wage. The agencies shall also assess the effects of the minimum wage increases scheduled in
§

40.1-28.10

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. The agencies shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an executive summary and a report of their findings and recommendations. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents no later than December 1, 2023, and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 816 and 832 are identical, and substituted “(Reserved)” for “Any person who shall have reached his or her sixty-fifth birthday” in subdivision B 11.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and rewrote subdivision B 7, which read “Any person confined in any penal, corrective or mental institution of the State or any of its political subdivisions”; substituted “physical deficiency, mental illness, or intellectual disability” for “physical or mental deficiency” at the end of subdivision B 13, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 14, deleted “and apprentices” following “students” and “or apprenticeship” following “educational.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 330 and 331 are identical, and redesignated the former introductory language and the definitions in subsections A through C as subsection A and arranged the definitions alphabetically; in the definition of “Employee,” in subdivision 4, substituted “Caddies on golf courses” for “Newsboys, shoe-shine boys, caddies on golf courses, babysitters, ushers, doormen, concession attendants and cashiers in theaters,” in subdivision 8, substituted “summer camp for boys, girls, or both boys and girls” for “boys’ and/or girls’ summer camp,” deleted subdivision 11, which read: “[Repealed]” and redesignated the former subdivision 16A as subdivision 16, added subdivision 18 and renumbered accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1145, substituted “organizations are” for “organizations” in subdivision A 3; substituted “parent” for “father, mother” in subdivision A 6; substituted “Commonwealth” for “State” in subdivision A 7; rewrote subdivision A 14; added the definition for “Tipped employee” in subdivision A 18; added the last sentence in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1146, substituted “organization is” for “organizations are” in subdivision A 3; substituted “parent” for “father, mother” in subdivision A 6; substituted “Commonwealth” for “State” in subdivision A 7; deleted former subdivision A 10, which read: “Any person who normally works and is paid based on the amount of work done”, and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; rewrote subdivision A 13; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1147, added the definition for “Domestic service” in subsection A; deleted “in domestic service or in or about a private home or” following “employed” in subdivision A 2; substituted “organization is” for “organizations are” in subdivision A 3; substituted “parent” for “father, mother” in subdivision A 6; substituted “Commonwealth” for “State” in subdivision A 7; in subdivision A 14, substituted “(i) the spouse, children” for “husbands, wives, sons, daughters,” and added clause (ii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1204 and 1242 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the definitions of “Adjusted state hourly minimum wage,” “Federal minimum wage,” “Home care provider,” and “Tipped employee”; rewrote the existing provisions of subsection A; added the last sentence in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Master and Servant, § 9.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Employers. —

Defendants’ pleas in bar were sustained in this failure to pay wages case; plaintiff alleged that defendants were employers as defined in Va. Code Ann. §

40.1-2

, yet plaintiff’s counsel cited Va. Code Ann. §

40.1-28.9

, but the court found that defendants did not meet either definition. Defendants’ power to unilaterally hire and fire employees and modify compensation appeared nonexistent, payroll checks were not stopped by them, and court could not impose personal liability on them for debts belonging to the company. Cornell v. Christian Psychotherapy Servs., P.C., 108 Va. Cir. 200, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 187 (Virginia Beach June 11, 2021).

§ 40.1-28.10.
Minimum wages.

Prior to May 1, 2021, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the federal minimum wage.
A. 1. Prior to May 1, 2021, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the federal minimum wage.

Beginning May 1, 2021, every employer shall pay to each of his employees at a rate not less than the federal minimum wage or 75 percent of the Virginia minimum wage provided for in this section, whichever is greater. For the purposes of this subdivision “employee” means any person or individual who is enrolled in an established employer on-the-job or other training program for a period not to exceed 90 days which meets standards set by regulations adopted by the Commissioner.

From May 1, 2021, until January 1, 2022, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the greater of (i) $9.50 per hour or (ii) the federal minimum wage.

From January 1, 2022, until January 1, 2023, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the greater of (i) $11.00 per hour or (ii) the federal minimum wage.

From January 1, 2023, until January 1, 2025, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the greater of (i) $12.00 per hour or (ii) the federal minimum wage.

(For effective date, see Acts 2020, cc. 1204 and 1242) From January 1, 2025, until January 1, 2026, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the greater of (i) $13.50 per hour or (ii) the federal minimum wage.

(For effective date, see Acts 2020, cc. 1204 and 1242) From January 1, 2026, until January 1, 2027, every employer shall pay to each of its employees wages at a rate not less than the greater of (i) $15.00 per hour or (ii) the federal minimum wage.

From and after January 1, 2027, every employer shall pay to each of his employees wages at a rate not less than the greater of (i) the adjusted state hourly minimum wage or (ii) the federal minimum wage.

By October 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Commissioner shall establish the adjusted state hourly minimum wage that shall be in effect during the 12-month period commencing on the following January 1. The Commissioner shall set the adjusted state hourly minimum wage at the sum of (i) the amount of the state hourly minimum wage rate that is in effect on the date such adjustment is made and (ii) a percentage of the amount described in clause (i) that is equal to the percentage by which the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor, or a successor index as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor, has increased during the most recent calendar year for which such information is available. The amount of each annual adjustment shall not be less than zero.

History.

1975, c. 530; 1976, c. 736; 1978, c. 371; 1980, c. 532; 1991, cc. 547, 596; 1997, c. 544; 2020, cc. 1204, 1242.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1204 and 1242, cl. 2 provides: “Beginning January 1, 2022, the Virginia Department of Housing and Community Development, the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority, and the Virginia Employment Commission (the agencies) shall conduct a joint review of the feasibility and potential impact of instituting a regional minimum wage in the Commonwealth. In evaluating a regional minimum wage, the agencies shall form a work group to assess various factors, including, but not limited to, the cost of living in the Commonwealth; the potential impact on employers and any fringe benefits offered to employees such as employer-sponsored health insurance; the potential impact on workers, with a focus on income inequality; the potential impact on agricultural workers; the experience of other states with a regional wage; and the equity and fairness of the exemption from the minimum wage for any person employed as a farm laborer or farm employee provided by §

40.1-28.10

of the Code of Virginia. The agencies also shall provide an assessment of options for utilizing a minimum wage in the Commonwealth, the feasibility of a regional minimum wage, and the economic benefits or impacts of utilizing a minimum wage. The agencies shall also assess the effects of the minimum wage increases scheduled in §

40.1-28.10

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. The agencies shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an executive summary and a report of their findings and recommendations. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents no later than December 1, 2023, and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1204 and 1242, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of subsections E and F of §

40.1-28.10

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective unless reenacted by a regular or special session of the General Assembly prior to July 1, 2024. If the General Assembly does not reenact subsections E and F by July 1, 2024, then (i) the Commissioner of Labor and Industry shall establish the adjusted state hourly minimum wage as provided in subsection H by October 1, 2024, and annually thereafter; and (ii) from and after January 1, 2025, every employer shall pay to each of his employees wages as specified in subsections G.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1204 and 1242 are identical, and designated the first paragraph as subdivision A 1, added subdivision A 2 and subsections B through H and in subdivision A 1, substituted “Prior to May 1, 2021, every” for “Every” and “its” for “his” and deleted “and a training wage as prescribed by the U.S. Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.)” following “wage” at the end. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

§ 40.1-28.11.
Penalties.

Whoever knowingly and intentionally violates any provisions of this article shall be punished by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $200.

History.

1975, c. 530.

§ 40.1-28.12.
Employee’s remedies.

Any employer who violates the minimum wage requirements of this law shall be liable to the employee or employees affected in the amount of the unpaid minimum wages, plus interest at eight per centum per annum upon such unpaid wages as may be due the plaintiff, said interest to be awarded from the date or dates said wages were due the employee or employees. The court may, in addition to any judgment awarded to the employee or employees, require defendant to pay reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the employee or employees.

History.

1975, c. 530.